Washington statutes.
RCW 8.20.170

Suit for compensation by owner equivalent to condemnation.

Nothing in RCW 8.20.150 through 8.20.170 shall prevent the owner of any such property suing for and recovering compensation for such property without instituting suit or proceedings to oust such corporation therefrom, and upon payment of the amount awarded such owner title to the property shall vest in such corporation as effectually as if acquired by proceedings in condemnation.

[ 1927 c 219 s 3; RRS s 921-3.]